Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1849.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 145.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 145.1. A. Sixty (60) hours of continuing education
shall be required for renewal of an individual license to practice
podiatric medicine in this state. This must be obtained in the two-
year period immediately preceding the two-year period for which the
license is to be issued license renewal deadline. Such continuing
education shall include not less than two (2) hours of education in
pain management or two (2) hours of education in opioid use or
addiction, unless the licensee has demonstrated to the satisfaction
of the Board of Podiatric Medical Examiners that the licensee does
not currently hold a valid federal Drug Enforcement Administration
registration number. The continuing education required by this
section shall be any of the following:

1. Education presented by an organization approved by the
Council on Continuing Education of the American Podiatric Medical
Association Education;
2. A national, state or county podiatric medical association
meeting approved by the Board;
3. Hospital-sponsored scientific programs approved by the
Board; or
4. Six Meetings and hearings of the Board; provided, that not
more than six (6) hours of continuing education credit may be
obtained by attending such meetings and hearings of the Board; or
5. Education on medical marijuana approved by the Board.
At least thirty (30) hours of the required sixty (60) hours must be
obtained in this state, except that a podiatrist licensed in this
state who currently only practices outside of this state may
substitute hours of continuing education from the state or states in
which he or she practices.
B. Any practitioner not so satisfying the Board of the
fulfillment of the continuing education requirements required by
subsection A of this section shall cease to be entitled to have such
license renewed.
C. Any practitioner fully retired from the practice of
podiatric medicine shall be exempt from compliance with the
requirements imposed by subsection A of this section. However, upon
resuming the practice of podiatric medicine, the individual shall
fulfill such requirements which have accrued from October 1, 1979,
to the time of resumption of practice.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1849 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 10th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 4th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1849 Page 3